Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 9 Extradition

12-9-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Criminal Extradition Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-1

.

12-9-2.
Definitions.

Where appearing in this chapter:

“Executive authority” includes the governor, and any person performing the functions of governor in a state other than this state.

“Governor” includes any person performing the functions of governor by authority of the law of this state.

“State,” referring to a state other than this state, includes any other state or territory, organized or unorganized, of the United States of America.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-2

.

12-9-3.
Governor’s duty to deliver fugitives from justice.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of the Constitution of the United States controlling, and any and all acts of Congress enacted in pursuance of the Constitution, it is the duty of the governor of this state to have arrested and delivered up to the executive authority of any other state of the United States any person charged in that state with treason, felony, or other crime, who has fled from justice and is found in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-3

.

12-9-4.
Form of demand from another state.

No demand for the extradition of a person charged with a crime in another state shall be recognized by the governor unless in writing alleging, except in cases arising under §§

12-9-7

and

12-9-8

, that the accused was present in the demanding state at the time of the commission of the alleged crime, and that after the commission of the alleged crime he or she fled from the state, and accompanied by a copy of an indictment found or by information supported by affidavit in the state having jurisdiction of the crime, or by a copy of an affidavit made before a judge there, together with a copy of any warrant which was issued, upon the indictment or information, or by a copy of a judgment of conviction or of a sentence imposed in execution of the judgment, together with a statement by the executive authority of the demanding state that the person claimed has escaped from confinement or has broken the terms of his or her bail, probation, or parole. The indictment, information, or affidavit made before the judge must substantially charge the person demanded with having committed a crime under the law of that state, and the copy of indictment, information, affidavit, judgment of conviction, or sentence must be authenticated by the executive authority making the demand.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-4

.

12-9-5.
Investigation as to demanded person.

When a demand shall be made upon the governor of this state by the executive authority of another state for the surrender of a person so charged with a crime, the governor may call upon the attorney general or any prosecuting officer in this state to investigate or assist in investigating the demand and to report to him or her the situation and circumstances of the person so demanded, and whether he or she ought to be surrendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-4

.

12-9-6.
Agreement to return person demanded from another state.

When it is desired to have returned to this state a person charged in this state with a crime, and the person is imprisoned or is held under criminal proceedings then pending against the person in another state, the governor of this state may agree with the executive authority of the other state for the extradition of the person before the conclusion of the proceedings or his or her term of sentence in the other state upon condition that the person be returned to the other state at the expense of this state as soon as the prosecution in this state is terminated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-6

.

12-9-7.
Surrender of person who left demanding state involuntarily.

The governor of this state may also surrender on demand of the executive authority of any other state any person in this state who is charged in the manner provided in §

12-9-4

with having violated the laws of the state whose executive authority is making the demand, even though the person left the demanding state involuntarily.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-7

.

12-9-8.
Surrender of person committing an act in one state resulting in a crime in another.

The governor of this state may also surrender, on demand of the executive authority of any other state, any person in this state charged in the other state in the manner provided in §

12-9-4

with committing an act in this state or in a third state, intentionally resulting in a crime in the state whose executive authority is making the demand, when the acts for which extradition is sought would be punishable by the laws of this state, and if the consequences claimed to have resulted from the crime in the demanding state had taken effect in this state. The provisions of this chapter, not otherwise inconsistent, shall apply to those cases, even though the accused was not in that state at the time of the commission of the crime and has not fled from that state; provided, that the governor of this state may, in his or her discretion, make any surrender conditional upon agreement by the executive authority of the demanding state that the person so surrendered will be held to answer no criminal charges of any nature except those set forth in the requisition upon which the person is so surrendered, at least until the person has been given reasonable opportunity to return to this state after his or her acquittal, if he or she shall be acquitted, or if he or she shall be convicted, after he or she shall be released from confinement. Nothing in §§

12-9-7

and

12-9-8

shall apply to the crime of libel.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-8

.

12-9-9.
Warrant of arrest on executive demand.

If the governor decides that the demand should be complied with, he or she shall sign a warrant of arrest, which shall be sealed with the state seal, and be directed to any peace officer or other person whom he or she may think fit to entrust with its execution. The warrant must substantially recite the facts necessary to the validity of its issuance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-9

.

12-9-10.
Authority granted by warrant.

The warrant shall authorize the peace officer or other person to whom directed to arrest the accused at any time and any place where he or she may be found within the state and to command the aid of all peace officers or other persons in the execution of the warrant, and to deliver the accused, subject to the provisions of this chapter, to the duly authorized agent of the demanding state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-10

.

12-9-11.
Commanding assistance in execution of warrant.

Every peace officer, or other person empowered to make the arrest, shall have the same authority, in arresting the accused, to command assistance in the arrest as peace officers have by law in the execution of any criminal process directed to them, with like penalties against those who refuse their assistance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-11

.

12-9-12.
Appearance of prisoner before judge — Application for habeas corpus.

No person arrested upon a warrant issued under §

12-9-9

shall be delivered over to the agent whom the executive authority demanding him or her shall have appointed to receive him or her unless he or she shall first be taken immediately before a judge of a court of record in this state, who shall inform him or her of the demand made for his or her surrender and of the crime with which he or she is charged, and that he or she has the right to demand and procure legal counsel. If the prisoner or his or her counsel shall state that he or she or they desire to test the legality of the arrest, the judge of the court of record shall fix a reasonable time to be allowed him or her within which to apply for a writ of habeas corpus. When the writ is applied for, notice of the writ, and of the time and place of hearing on the writ, shall be given to the prosecuting officer and to the agent of the demanding state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-12

.

12-9-12.1.
Extradition of juveniles.

When the extradition of a child under the age of eighteen (18) years of age is demanded by another state, the child shall be summoned to appear or ordered to appear before the family court pursuant to the provisions of chapter 1 of title 14.

The provisions of §

12-9-12

shall apply to the hearing conducted by the family court. In addition when the other state seeks the extradition of the child for trial as an adult, the family court shall determine whether or not the child would have been tried as an adult in this state if charged with the offense alleged to have been committed in the other state. The family court shall apply the provisions of §§

14-1-7

and

14-1-7.1

in making the determination.

No person under the age of eighteen (18) years of age shall be extradited for trial in another state as an adult unless a justice of the family court determines that the person would have been tried as an adult in the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 366, § 1.

12-9-13.
Penalty for violating § 12-9-12.

Any officer who shall deliver to the agent for extradition of the demanding state a person in his or her custody under the governor’s warrant, in willful disobedience to §

12-9-12

, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, on conviction, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or be imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-13

.

12-9-14.
Confinement of prisoner pending extradition or en route.

The officer or persons executing the governor’s warrant or arrest, or the agent of the demanding state to whom the prisoner may have been delivered, may, when necessary, confine the prisoner in the jail of any county or city through which he or she may pass; and the keeper of the jail must receive and safely keep the prisoner until the officer or person having charge of the person is ready to proceed on his or her route, the officer or person being chargeable with the expense of keeping.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-14

.

12-9-15.
Confinement of prisoners passing through state.

The officer or agent of a demanding state to whom a prisoner may have been delivered following extradition proceedings in another state, or to whom a prisoner may have been delivered after waiving extradition in the other state, and who is passing through this state with a prisoner for the purpose of immediately returning the prisoner to the demanding state may, when necessary, confine the prisoner in the jail of any county or city through which he or she may pass; and the keeper of the jail must receive and safely keep the prisoner until the officer or agent having charge of him or her is ready to proceed on his or her route, the officer or agent, however, being chargeable with the expense of keeping; provided, that the officer or agent shall produce and show to the keeper of the jail satisfactory written evidence of the fact that he or she is actually transporting the prisoner to the demanding state after a requisition by the executive authority of the demanding state, or waiver of the requisition. The person shall not be entitled to demand a new requisition while in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-15

.

12-9-16.
Warrant of arrest on affidavit.

Whenever any person within this state shall be charged on the oath of any credible person before any judge of this state with the commission of any crime in any other state and, except in cases arising under §§

12-9-7

and

12-9-8

, with having fled from justice, or with having been convicted of a crime in that state and having escaped from confinement, or having broken the terms of his or her bail, probation, or parole, or whenever complaint shall have been made before any judge in this state setting forth on the affidavit of any credible person in another state that a crime has been committed in that other state and that the accused has been charged in that state with the commission of the crime, and, except in cases arising under §§

12-9-7

and

12-9-8

, has fled from justice, or with having been convicted of a crime in that state and having escaped from confinement, or having broken the terms of his or her bail, probation, or parole, and is believed to be in this state, the judge shall issue a warrant directed to any peace officer commanding him or her to apprehend the person named in the warrant, wherever he or she may be found in this state, and to bring him or her before the judge or any other judge or court who or which may be available in or convenient of access to the place where the arrest may be made, to answer the charges or complaint and affidavit, and a certified copy of the sworn charge or complaint and affidavit upon which the warrant is issued shall be attached to the warrant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-16

.

12-9-17.
Arrest without warrant.

The arrest of a person may also be lawfully made by any peace officer or a private person without a warrant, upon reasonable information that the accused stands charged in the courts of a state with a crime punishable by death or imprisonment for a term exceeding one year, but when so arrested, the accused must be taken before a judge with all practicable speed, and complaint must be made against him or her under oath, setting forth the ground for the arrest as in §

12-9-16

; and thereafter after that his or her answer shall be heard as if he or she had been arrested on a warrant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-17

.

12-9-18.
Commitment awaiting requisition.

If, from the examination before the judge, it appears that the person being held is the person charged with having committed the alleged crime and, except in cases arising under §§

12-9-7

and

12-9-8

, that the person has fled from justice, the judge must, by a warrant reciting the accusation, commit him or her to the adult correctional institutions for a time not exceeding thirty (30) days and specified in the warrant, as will enable the arrest of the accused to be made under a warrant of the governor or on requisition of the executive authority of the state having jurisdiction of the offense, unless the accused give bail as provided in §

12-9-19

, or until he or she shall be legally discharged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-18

.

12-9-19.
Admission to bail.

Unless the offense with which the prisoner is charged is shown to be an offense punishable by death or life imprisonment under the laws of the state in which it was committed, a judge in this state may admit the person arrested to bail by bond, with sufficient sureties, and in any sum that the judge deems proper, conditioned for the person’s appearance before the judge at a time specified in the bond, but not later than thirty (30) days after the examination referred to in §

12-9-18

, and for his or her surrender, to be arrested upon the warrant of the governor of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-19

.

12-9-20.
Failure to arrest on governor’s warrant within time specified.

If the accused is not arrested under warrant of the governor by the expiration of the time specified in the warrant or bond, a judge may discharge the accused or may recommit him or her for a further period not to exceed sixty (60) days, or a judge may again take bail for his or her appearance and surrender, as provided in §

12-9-19

, but within a period not to exceed sixty (60) days after the date of the new bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-20

.

12-9-21.
Forfeiture of bail.

If the prisoner is admitted to bail, and fails to appear and surrender according to the conditions of his or her bond, the judge, by proper order, shall declare the bond forfeited and order his or her immediate arrest without warrant if he or she is within this state. Recovery may be had on the bond in the name of the state as in the case of other bonds given by the accused in criminal proceedings within this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-21

.

12-9-22.
Persons under prosecution in this state.

If a criminal prosecution has been instituted against the person under the laws of this state and is still pending, the governor, in his or her discretion, either may surrender him or her on demand of the executive authority of another state or hold him or her until he or she has been tried and discharged or convicted and punished in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-22

.

12-9-23.
Guilt or innocence as subject of inquiry.

The guilt or innocence of the accused as to the crime of which he or she is charged may not be inquired into by the governor or in any proceeding after the demand for extradition accompanied by a charge of crime in legal form as provided in this chapter shall have been presented to the governor, except as it may be involved in identifying the person held as the person charged with the crime.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-23

.

12-9-24.
Recall or reissue of governor’s warrant.

The governor may recall his or her warrant of arrest or may issue another warrant whenever he or she deems it proper.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-24

.

12-9-25.
Warrant to return prisoner from another state.

Whenever the governor of this state shall demand a person charged with crime or with escaping from confinement or breaking the terms of his or her bail, probation, or parole in this state, from the executive authority of any other state, or from the chief justice or an associate justice of the supreme court of the District of Columbia authorized to receive a demand under the laws of the United States, he or she shall issue a warrant under the seal of this state to some agent, commanding the agent to receive the person so charged if delivered to him or her and convey the person to the proper officer of the county in this state in which the offense was committed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-25

.

12-9-26.
Application for requisition of person charged with crime.

When the return to this state of a person charged with a crime in this state is required, the attorney general shall present to the governor his or her written application for a requisition for the return of the person charged, in which application shall be stated the name of the person so charged, the crime charged against the person, the approximate time, place and circumstances of its commission, the state in which the person is believed to be, including the location of the accused in that state at the time the application is made, and certifying that, in the opinion of the attorney general, the ends of justice require the arrest and return of the accused to this state for trial and that the proceeding is not instituted to enforce a private claim.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-26

.

12-9-27.
Application for requisition of person convicted of crime.

When the return to this state is required of a person who has been convicted of a crime in this state and has escaped from confinement or broken the terms of his or her bail, probation, or parole, the attorney general or the warden of the institution from which escape was made shall present to the governor a written application for a requisition for the return of the person, in which shall be stated the name of the person, the crime of which the person was convicted, the circumstances of his or her escape from confinement or of the breach of the terms of his or her bail, probation, or parole, the state in which the person is believed to be, including the location of the person in that state at the time application is made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-27

.

12-9-28.
Affidavits and documents to support application.

The application shall be verified by affidavit, shall be executed in duplicate, and shall be accompanied by two (2) certified copies of the indictment returned, or information and affidavit filed, or of the complaint made of the judge, stating the offense with which the accused is charged, or of the judgment of conviction, or of the sentence. The attorney general, the director of corrections, or the warden may also attach any further affidavits and other documents in duplicate that he or she shall deem proper to be submitted with the application. One copy of the application, with the action of the governor indicated by endorsement on it, and one of the certified copies of the indictment, complaint, information, and affidavits, or of the judgment of conviction, or of the sentence shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state to remain on record in that office. The other copies of all papers shall be forwarded with the governor’s requisition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 23; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-28

.

12-9-29.
Immunity from civil process arising out of occurrence for which extradited.

A person brought into this state by, or after waiver of, extradition based on a criminal charge shall not be subject to service of personal process in civil actions arising out of the same facts as the criminal proceedings to answer which he or she is being or has been returned, until he or she has been convicted in the criminal proceeding, or, if acquitted, until he or she has had reasonable opportunity to return to the state from which he or she was extradited.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-29

.

12-9-30.
Execution of waiver of extradition.

Any person arrested in this state charged, with having committed any crime in another state, or alleged to have escaped from confinement or broken the terms of his or her bail, probation, or parole, may waive the issuance and service of the warrant provided for in §§

12-9-9

and

12-9-10

and all other procedure incidental to extradition proceedings, by executing or subscribing in the presence of a judge of any court of record within this state a writing which states that he or she consents to return to the demanding state; provided, that before the waiver shall be executed or subscribed by the person it shall be the duty of the judge to inform the person of his or her rights to the issuance and service of a warrant of extradition and to obtain a writ of habeas corpus as provided for in §

12-9-12

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-30

.

12-9-31.
Filing of consent — Delivery of prisoner to extradition agents.

If and when consent pursuant to §

12-9-30

has been duly executed it shall be immediately forwarded to the office of the governor of this state and filed in that office. The judge shall direct the officer having the person in custody to immediately deliver the person to the duly accredited agent or agents of the demanding state and shall deliver or cause to be delivered to the agent or agents a copy of his or her consent; provided, that nothing in this section and §

12-9-30

shall be deemed to limit the rights of the accused person to return voluntarily and without formality to the demanding state, nor shall this waiver procedure be deemed to be an exclusive procedure or to limit the powers, rights, or duties of the officers of the demanding state or of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-31

.

12-9-32.
State’s rights against extradited persons not waived.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to constitute a waiver by this state of its right, power, or privilege to try the demanded person for a crime committed within this state, or of its right, power, or privilege to regain custody of the person by extradition proceedings or otherwise for the purpose of trial, sentence, or punishment for any crime committed within this state, nor shall any proceedings had under this chapter which result in, or fail to result in, extradition be deemed a waiver by this state of any of its rights, privileges, or jurisdiction in any way whatsoever.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-32

.

12-9-33.
Trial for crimes not specified in requisition.

After a person has been brought back to this state by, or after waiver of, extradition proceedings, he or she may be tried in this state for other crimes which he or she may be charged with having committed here as well as that specified in the requisition for his or her extradition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-33

.

12-9-34.
Uniformity of construction.

The provisions of this chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purposes to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-34

.

12-9-35.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, its invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provisions of application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1890, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

12-9-35

.